dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX k0 N 3
SFX k0 0 chen/d0 [^r] is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k0 0 chen/d0 [^ä]r is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k0 0 chen/d0 är is:diminutive is:singular

SFX k1 N 1
SFX k1 0 chen/r3 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX k6 N 86
SFX k6 and ëndchen/d1 [Kk]and is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ond ëndchen/d1 ond is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 aart äertchen/d0 aart is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ouf éifchen/d1 ouf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ouss éisschen/d1 ouss is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 out éitchen/d1 out is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 all ällchen/d0 all is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oft ëftchen/d0 oft is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oun éinchen/d0 oun is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ot éitchen/d0 ot is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 app äppchen/d0 app is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ak äckelchen/r3 ak is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 allem ällemchen/r3 allem is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 antel äntelchen/r3 antel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 aach ächelchen/r3 aach is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ack äckelchen/r3 ack is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 am ämmchen/d0 [lHh]am is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 atz ätzelchen/r3 atz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 az ätzelchen/r3 [Ss]az is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ommel ëmmelchen/r3 ommel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 allef ällefchen/r3 allef is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 auch äichelchen/r3 auch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ock éckchen/d0 ock is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oup éipchen/d0 oup is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ox éxelchen/r3 ox is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 amm ämmchen/d0 amm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 auscht äischtchen/d0 auscht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ous éischen/d0 ous is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 aass ässchen/d0 [Ff]aass is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ascht äschtchen/d0 [^Aa]ascht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ochs échschen/d0 ochs is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 anger éngerchen/r3 anger is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 orm ërmchen/d0 orm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 omper ëmperchen/r3 omper is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ann ännchen/d0 ann is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oer eeërchen/r3 oer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 aff äffchen/d0 aff is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 als älschen/d0 als is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ollef ëllefchen/r3 ollef is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 onken énkchen/d0 onken is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 offer ëfferchen/r3 offer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 amp ämmchen/d0 amp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 an ännchen/d0 an is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 auz äizchen/d0 auz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 omp ëmpchen/d0 omp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oppel ëppelchen/r3 oppel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ondel ëndelchen/r3 ondel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ouer éierchen/r3 ouer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ossel ësselchen/r3 ossel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 aufel äifelchen/r3 aufel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ach ächelchen/r3 [^a]ach is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 az ätzchen/d0 [Kkl]az is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oul éilchen/d0 oul is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 aarf äerfchen/d1 aarf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 a ächen/d0 a is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 anz änzelchen/r3 [Pp]anz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ong éngelchen/r3 ong is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 osch ëschelchen/r3 osch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 opp ëppchen/d0 opp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 onn ënnchen/d0 onn is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oss ësschen/d0 oss is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 omm ëmmchen/d0 omm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 anz änzchen/d0 [lr]anz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ong éngchen/d0 hong is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 äin éngchen/d0 äin is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oll ëllchen/d0 oll is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 afel äffelchen/r3 afel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 och échelchen/r3 och is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ass ässelchen/r3 lass is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ant ännchen/d0 ant is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ou éichen/d0 ou is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 aass ässelchen/r3 [Gg]aass is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ammel ämmelchen/r3 ammel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 Apel Äppelchen/r3 Apel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 Af Äffchen/d0 Af is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 al älchen/d0 al is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ocker éckerchen/r3 ocker is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ank änkelchen/r3 ank is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ap äppchen/d0 ap is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 Aascht Äschtchen/d0 Aascht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 and ändchen/d1 [^Kk]and is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 Ouer Éierchen/r3 Ouer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 Aarm Äermchen/d0 Aarm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 oscht ëschtchen/d0 oscht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 att ättchen/d0 att is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k6 ar ärchen/d0 ar is:diminutive is:singular

SFX k4 N 1
SFX k4 0 chen/d1 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX k2 N 1
SFX k2 en chen/d0 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX k3 N 1
SFX k3 0 elchen/r3 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX f7 N 4
SFX f7 en 0 . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f7 en 0 . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX f7 n r . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX f7 nen 0 [^n]nen is:m2f is:feminine is:singular is:plural

SFX q0 N 4
SFX q0 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX q0 n r . is:plural
SFX q0 en 0 . is:plural
SFX q0 nen 0 [^n]nen is:plural

SFX v2 N 6
SFX v2 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX v2 en t [^rt]en is:ip is:3ps
SFX v2 en 0 ten is:ip is:3ps
SFX v2 en t [^ä]ren is:ip is:3ps
SFX v2 ren ert ären is:ip is:3ps
SFX v2 ën t ën is:ip is:3ps

SFX f1 N 1
SFX f1 r se/n4 . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX f2 N 1
SFX f2 er ère/n4 . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX f3 N 2
SFX f3 eur rice/n4 eur is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f3 or rice/n4 or is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX f4 N 2
SFX f4 eur orin/n9 eur is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f4 er orin/n9 er is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX f5 N 3
SFX f5 e in/n9 e is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f5 en in/n9 en is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f5 er in/n9 er is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX f8 N 3
SFX f8 0 e/n2 [^n] is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f8 0 ne/n4 [^i]n is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f8 0 e/n2 in is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX n5 N 7
SFX n5 0 ien/c0 [^l][glz] is:plural
SFX n5 0 ten/c0 u is:plural
SFX n5 0 jen/c0 ll is:plural
SFX n5 n 0 n is:eifeler
SFX n5 0 den/c0 n is:plural
SFX n5 ip ippien ip is:plural
SFX n5 ip ippie ip is:plural is:eifeler
